Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1505.   Determination of compensation for architect-engineer services.

(1)  The procurement officer shall award a contract to a qualified firm at compensation that the procurement officer determines, in writing, to be fair and reasonable to the state.

(2)  In making the determination described in Subsection (1), the procurement officer shall take into account the services':

(a)  estimated value;

(b)  scope;

(c)  complexity; and

(d)  professional nature.

(3)  If the procurement officer is unable to agree to a satisfactory contract with the firm first selected, at a price the procurement officer determines to be fair and reasonable to the state, the procurement officer shall:

(a)  formally terminate discussions with that firm; and

(b)  undertake discussions with a second qualified firm. 

(4)  If the procurement officer is unable to agree to a satisfactory contract with the second firm selected, at a price the procurement officer determines to be fair and reasonable to the state, the procurement officer shall:

(a)  formally terminate discussions with that firm; and

(b)  undertake discussions with a third qualified firm. 

(5)  If the procurement officer is unable to award a contract at a fair and reasonable price to any of the selected firms, the procurement officer shall:

(a)  select additional firms; and

(b)  continue discussions in accordance with this part until an agreement is reached.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

